Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Farm-to-Market Projects

§ 65-11-61.
Repair of roadbed, surfacing, and bridges damaged by floods.

The purpose of this section is to authorize the Highway Commission to repair roadbed, surfacing, and bridges being constructed as farm-to-market projects under the provisions of the County Highway Aid Law of 1946, Sections 65-11-1 through 65-11-37. Said roadbed, surfacing, and bridges having been damaged by excessive floods before final acceptance of the projects and no provision being made by law for their repair, this section is intended as supplemental to said 1946 law.

The Mississippi State Highway Commission is authorized, in its discretion, to repair any roadbeds which have been damaged by floods on roads built under the provisions of the cited sections, out of any monies on hand from the appropriation to carry out the provisions of said sections to the credit of the county in which said road is situated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328-32; Laws, 1950, ch. 390, §§ 1, 2.